Tennessee, session 114, HB0264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (40).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee board of judicial conduct, created by § 17-5-201;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0264
000345
- 1 -